Utah statutes.
57-4a-1.   Document recordable despite defects.

Each document executed and acknowledged on or before July 1, 1988, may be recorded in the office of the county recorder regardless of any defect or irregularity in its execution, attestation, or acknowledgment.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 1988 General Session

